Washington statutes.
RCW 19.02.030

Business licensing service—Duties—Rules.

(1) There is located within the department a business licensing service.

(2) The duties of the business licensing service include:

(a) Developing and administering a computerized one-stop business licensing system capable of storing, retrieving, and exchanging license information with due regard to privacy statutes, as well as issuing and renewing business licenses in an efficient manner;

(b) Providing a license information service detailing requirements to establish or engage in business in this state;

(c) Providing for staggered business license renewal dates;

(d) Identifying types of licenses appropriate for inclusion in the business licensing system;

(e) Recommending in reports to the governor and the legislature the elimination, consolidation, or other modification of duplicative, ineffective, or inefficient licensing or inspection requirements; and

(f) Incorporating licenses into the business licensing system. Both the regulatory agency legally authorized to issue the license and the department must agree that the license will be issued through the *master license system in order for the license to be incorporated.

(3) The department may adopt under chapter 34.05 RCW such rules as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

[ 2013 c 144 s 17; 2013 c 111 s 3; 2011 c 298 s 5; 1999 c 240 s 5; 1993 c 142 s 4; 1982 c 182 s 3; 1979 c 158 s 76; 1977 ex.s. c 319 s 3.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The term "master license system" changed to "business licensing system" by chapter 144, Laws of 2013.

(2) This section was amended by 2013 c 111 s 3 and by 2013 c 144 s 17, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Purpose—Intent—Agency transfer—Contracting—Effective date—2011 c 298: See notes following RCW 19.02.020.